tests/digits.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Cases 0": 
    0<num><subst><acc> : 0-у
    0<num><subst><par> : 0-ла
    0<num><subst><dat> : 0-га

  "Cases 1": 
    1<num><subst><acc> : 1-и
    1<num><subst><par> : 1-дэ
    1<num><subst><dat> : 1-гэ
  
  "Cases 2":
    2<num><subst><acc> : 2-ни
    2<num><subst><par> : 2-тэ
    2<num><subst><dat> : 2-гэ

  "Cases 3": 
    3<num><subst><acc> : 3-ү
    3<num><subst><par> : 3-тэ
    3<num><subst><dat> : 3-кэ

  "Cases 4": 
    4<num><subst><acc> : 4-ү
    4<num><subst><par> : 4-тэ
    4<num><subst><dat> : 4-кэ

  "Cases 5": 
    5<num><subst><acc> : 5-и
    5<num><subst><par> : 5-тэ
    5<num><subst><dat> : 5-кэ

  "Cases 6": 
    6<num><subst><acc> : 6-ны
    6<num><subst><par> : 6-та
    6<num><subst><dat> : 6-ҕа

  "Cases 7": 
    7<num><subst><acc> : 7-ни
    7<num><subst><par> : 7-тэ
    7<num><subst><dat> : 7-ҕэ
  
  "Cases 8":
    8<num><subst><acc> : 8-ы
    8<num><subst><par> : 8-та
    8<num><subst><dat> : 8-ка

  "Cases 9": 
    9<num><subst><acc> : 9-у
    9<num><subst><par> : 9-та
    9<num><subst><dat> : 9-ка

  "Cases 10": 
    10<num><subst><acc> : 10-у
    10<num><subst><par> : 10-на
    10<num><subst><dat> : 10-ҥа

  "Cases 100": 
    100<num><subst><acc> : 100-ү
    100<num><subst><par> : 100-тэ
    100<num><subst><dat> : 100-кэ
